Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-5439
Prior authorization; not required; services enumerated.

No utilization review agent shall require prior authorization of:

(1) Emergency confinement or an emergency health care service;

(2) Pre-hospital transportation for the provision of emergency health care services or for transfers between facilities as required by the federal Emergency Medical Treatment and Labor Act; or

(3) Services that have a rating of A or B from the United States Preventive Services Task Force, immunizations recommended by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, or preventive services and screenings provided to women as required by 45 C.F.R. 147.130.

Laws 2025, LB77, § 8.